Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201360-3101
State fleet card programs; Department
of Roads; University of Nebraska; State Treasurer; duties; political subdivisions;
utilization authorized; unauthorized use prohibited.

(1) State fleet card programs shall
be created and shall be administered separately by the Department of Roads
and the University of Nebraska. The Department of Roads shall administer a
fleet card program on behalf of state government and political subdivisions
other than the University of Nebraska under a contract through the State Treasurer.
The State Treasurer shall determine the type of fleet card or cards utilized
in the state fleet card program. The State Treasurer shall contract with one
or more financial institutions, card-issuing banks, credit card companies,
charge card companies, debit card companies, or third-party merchant banks
capable of operating a fleet card program on behalf of the state, including
the University of Nebraska, and political subdivisions that participate in
the state contract for such services. Rules and regulations may be adopted
and promulgated as needed by the Department of Roads or the University of
Nebraska for the operation of the state fleet card programs. The rules and
regulations shall provide authorization instructions for all transactions.
Expenses associated with the state fleet card programs shall be considered
as an administrative or operational expense.

(2) For purposes of
this section, fleet card means a payment card used for gasoline, diesel, and
other fuels. Fleet cards may also be used to pay for vehicle and equipment
maintenance and expenses at the discretion of the program administrator. The
Department of Roads and the University of Nebraska shall each designate a
program administrator.

(3)
Any state official, agency, board, or commission may utilize a state fleet
card for the purchase of goods and services described in subsection (2) of
this section for and on behalf of the State of Nebraska. Any political subdivision
may utilize a fleet card for the purchase of goods and services described
in subsection (2) of this section for lawful government purposes of the political
subdivision. No disbursements or cash back on fleet card transactions shall
be allowed.

(4)
Vendors accepting a state fleet card shall obtain authorization for all transactions
in accordance with instructions from the program administrator. Transaction
authorization shall be from the financial institution, card-issuing bank,
credit card company, charge card company, debit card company, or third-party
merchant bank contracted to provide such service to the State of Nebraska.
Each transaction shall be authorized in accordance with the instructions provided
by the program administrator for each state official, agency, board, or commission
or each political subdivision.

(5) Detailed transaction information for the purposes
of tracking expenditures shall include fleet card identification, merchant
name and address, transaction number, date, time, product, quantity, cost,
and equipment meter reading if applicable. A state fleet card program may
require an itemized receipt for purposes of tracking expenditures of a state
fleet card purchase from a commercial vendor as acceptable detailed transaction
information. If detailed transaction information is not provided, the program
administrator shall have the authority to temporarily or permanently suspend
state fleet card purchases in accordance with rules and regulations.

(6) No officer or employee
of the state or of a political subdivision shall use a state fleet card for
any unauthorized use.

Laws 2013, LB137, § 1.